Hawaii statutes.
§28-2 Prosecutes offenders, enforces bonds.
The attorney general shall be vigilant and active in detecting offenders
against the laws of the State, and shall prosecute the same with diligence.
The attorney general shall also enforce all bonds and other obligations in
favor of the State that may be placed in the attorney general's hands for that
purpose, by any person having the lawful custody of the papers; and the
attorney general shall likewise be diligent in prosecuting all persons who may
obstruct any street, channel, harbor, wharf, or other highway, or any stream or
public watercourse, or commit any trespass, or waste on any portion of the
public domain, or other public property. [L 1866, p 17; RL 1925, §1487; RL
1935, §501; RL 1945, §1502; RL 1955, §30-2; HRS §28-2; gen ch 1993]

Case Notes

Duties in connection with divorce matters. 35 H. 849.

Supersession of county prosecutor upheld. 63 H. 424, 629
P.2d 1126.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next